Wisconsin, session 2025, AB545.
do enact as follows:AB545,13Section 1. 36.27 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB545,2,5436.27 (1) (a) Subject to par. pars. (b) and (c), the board may establish for 5different classes of students differing tuition and fees incidental to enrollment in 1educational programs or use of facilities in the system. Except as otherwise 2provided in this section, the board may charge any student who is not exempted by 3this section a nonresident tuition. The board may establish special rates of tuition 4and fees for the extension and summer sessions and such other studies or courses of 5instruction as the board deems advisable.AB545,26Section 2. 36.27 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB545,2,9736.27 (1) (c) The board shall ensure that no student is charged an incidental 8or supplemental fee for enrolling in a course offered exclusively online unless any of 9the following applies:AB545,2,12101. The fee is charged to cover actual costs incurred by an institution that are 11specifically attributable to offering the course online and that would not be incurred 12by the institution if students attended the course in person.AB545,2,14132. The fee is also charged for enrolling in an equivalent course offered for in-14person attendance.AB545,315Section 3. Initial applicability.AB545,2,1716(1) This act first applies to the first semester or session beginning at least 30 17days after the effective date of this subsection.AB545,2,1818